Massachusetts, session 194th, S586.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 2A the 
following section:- 
Section 2B. (a) There shall be within the office a drought management task force. The 
task force shall consist of: the secretary or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the director of 
the Massachusetts emergency management agency or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the 
commissioner of agricultural resources or a designee; the commissioner of conservation and 
recreation or a designee; the commissioner of environmental protection or a designee; the state 
fire marshal or a designee; the commissioner of fish and game or a designee; the commissioner 
of public health or a designee; the commissioner of public utilities or a designee; the executive 
director of the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority or a designee; the executive director of 

of 3 11 the Massachusetts Association of Health Boards, Inc.; the executive director of the 
Massachusetts Rivers Alliance, Inc., or a designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts 
Water Works Association Inc.; and the executive director of the Water Supply Citizens advisory 
committee to the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority. The co-chairs may invite officials 
from federal agencies to provide scientific and technical input and shall have joint responsibility 
for coordinating the task force. The task force shall meet not less than monthly when drought 
conditions exist. The task force shall be staffed by a director appointed by the secretary. 
(b) The task force shall: (i) assist in collecting and assessing technical information; (ii) 
facilitate coordination and communication among task force members, agencies and the public; 
and (iii) provide recommendations to the secretary, the secretary of public safety and security 
and the governor on the existing drought level and any proposed responses to such drought level. 
The task force shall also make recommendations for the end of a drought or the reduction of the 
drought level or for the commencement or cessation of a drought declaration. 
(c) The task force shall maintain and periodically update a statewide drought 
management plan that addresses drought preparedness and response protocol to drought 
conditions and protects public health, public safety and the environment. The task force may 
update the statewide drought management plan at any time; provided, however, that the plan 
shall be reviewed not less than every 5 years and updated not less than every 10 years; provided 
further, that the drought management plan shall be approved by the water resources commission. 
(d) The task force may create and maintain a map that shall seek to create drought regions 
consistent with watersheds. 

of 3 32  (e) The secretary may order water conservation measures, including limits on 
nonessential outdoor water use, based on the severity of drought in drought regions to protect 
public health, safety or the environment. Such water conservation measures shall apply to all 
water users within a drought region unless otherwise determined by the secretary with prior 
notice to the task force. 
(f) Notwithstanding section 27C of chapter 29 or any other general or special law, 
ordinance, by-law, rule or regulation to the contrary, cities and towns shall enforce water 
conservation restrictions issued by the secretary to the fullest extent permitted by law.